California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) Facility maintenance and improvements, including, but not limited to, maintenance and minor renovations to address concerns related to the COVID-19 pandemic such as nonstructural changes to create space for social distancing, minor remodeling and upgrading of facilities to meet licensing requirements or health and safety standards, or other related costs as determined by the department.

(f) The department shall determine the appropriate grant amount for each grantee, based upon factors that include, but are not limited to, the scope of the project, regional costs, the use of universal design to provide inclusive environments, the need to meet licensing requirements or health and safety standards, and the proportion of children receiving subsidies to be served.

(g) The department shall establish
 the terms and conditions associated with accepting the infrastructure grant funds awarded pursuant to this section.

(h) The grant program shall offer technical assistance to potential applicants before being awarded a grant, including, but not limited to, project development support and financial expertise, including assistance with coordinating financing from multiple sources.

(i) Infrastructure grant recipients shall commit to providing program data to the department, as specified by the department, and shall participate in overall program evaluation.

(j) The department, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, may establish an appropriate method, process, and structure for grant management, fiscal accountability, and technical assistance and supports for grantees that ensures transparency and
 accountability in the use of state funds. The department, at its discretion, may set aside a percentage of the amounts appropriated for the program to contract with one or more community development financial intermediaries, state financial entities, or other community-based organizations for these purposes.

(k) For purposes of this section, “state or federally declared disaster” means counties where child care and development and preschool providers are operating subject to a Presidential declaration of an emergency or major disaster, pursuant to the federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.), or a Governor’s Proclamation, on behalf of the impacted local government, as authorized by the powers authorized by the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(l) A grantee that receives funds under this section shall supplement, and not supplant, federal, state, and local public funds expended for these purposes.

(m) Notwithstanding subdivision (g) and the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions.

(n) This section shall take effect only to the extent that funds are appropriated for this program by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10310.2.

(a) Subject to an appropriation made by the Legislature for this purpose, the department shall administer and implement a program for disaster-related infrastructure grants, in accordance with the requirements, conditions, and allowable uses established by the applicable funding source, to support childcare facilities that are listed in subdivision (b) and that are impacted by a state-or federally declared disaster.

(b) The department shall award the disaster-related infrastructure grants described in subdivision (a) on a competitive or noncompetitive basis, as determined by the department and in accordance with this section, to any of the following:

(1) A childcare center or
 family childcare home serving children through an alternative payment program pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10225).

(2) A childcare center or family childcare home serving children in a migrant childcare and development program pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 10235).

(3) A childcare center or family childcare home serving children through a California state preschool program pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 8207) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code.

(4) A childcare center or family childcare home serving children through a general childcare and development program pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10240).

(5) A family childcare home serving children pursuant to
 Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10250).

(6) An entity providing childcare and development services for children with special needs pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10260).

(7) A childcare center or family childcare home serving children through a CalWORKs Stage 1, Stage 2, or Stage 3 program pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370).

(8) A childcare center or family childcare home serving children through the Emergency Child Care Bridge Program for Foster Children pursuant to Section 11461.6.

(9) Any licensed childcare facility, or a tribal childcare program operating pursuant to tribal law or regulations, that provides services in an area impacted by a state- or federally declared disaster.

(c) The department shall award disaster-related infrastructure grants in accordance with funding received for either of the following purposes:

(1) Renovation and repair of existing childcare facilities that have been damaged or otherwise impacted as a result of a state- or federally declared disaster.

(2) Repair or replacement of materials, supplies, furnishings, outdoor play spaces, and nonfixed equipment that have been damaged, destroyed, or otherwise impacted as a result of a state- or federally declared disaster.

(d) The department shall award grants to applicants based on criteria, as established by the department, in a manner consistent with this section. The department shall release guidance to the public outlining the criteria for grant awards and
 the application process.

(e) The department shall give priority based on criteria established by the department for grant funding, which may include prioritizing applicants that are currently serving subsidized children in facilities described in subdivision (b) and who are not eligible for federal funding for these purposes.

(f) The department shall determine the appropriate grant amount for each grantee, based on factors that include, but are not limited to, the scope of the project, regional costs, the use of universal design to provide inclusive environments, the need to meet licensing requirements or health and safety standards, and the proportion of children receiving subsidies to be served.

(g) The department shall establish the terms and conditions associated with accepting the infrastructure grant funds
 awarded pursuant to this section.

(h) The grant program shall offer technical assistance to potential applicants before being awarded a grant, including, but not limited to, project development support and financial expertise, including assistance with coordinating financing from multiple sources.

(i) Disaster-related infrastructure grant recipients shall provide program data to the department, as specified by the department, and shall participate in overall program evaluation.

(j) The department, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, may establish an appropriate method, process, and structure for grant management, fiscal accountability, and technical assistance and supports for grantees that ensure transparency and accountability in the use of state funds. The department, at its discretion, may set
 aside a percentage of the amounts appropriated for the program to contract with one or more community development financial intermediaries, state financial entities, or other community-based organizations for these purposes.

(k) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Disaster-related infrastructure grant” means an infrastructure grant made available to, at least in part, support a childcare facility for either of the purposes identified in subdivision (c), following the declaration of a state- or federally declared disaster.

(2) “State- or federally declared disaster” means a circumstance in which a childcare and development provider or preschool provider is operating subject to an emergency or major disaster declaration by the President of the United States pursuant to the federal Robert
 T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.), or subject to an emergency proclamation by the Governor, on behalf of the impacted local government, as authorized pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code). A “state- or federally declared disaster” may include, but is not limited to, a fire, flood, earthquake, or period of civil unrest, subject to the conditions described in this subdivision.

(l) A grantee that receives funds under this section shall use these funds to supplement, and not supplant, other federal, state, and local public funds expended for these purposes.

(m) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 25, Sec. 34.   (AB 150)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10311.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, subject to an appropriation for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, administer the Early Learning and Care Workforce Development Grants Program to expand the number of qualified early learning and care professionals and increase the educational credentials of existing early learning and care professionals across the state, pursuant to this section.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, subject to an appropriation for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, award and administer the workforce development grants to local, regional, or local and regional quality improvement partnerships, as defined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, consistent with the Quality Rating and Improvement
 System local consortia, as defined in Section 8203.1 of the Education Code, representing all counties of the state. A local, regional, or local and regional quality improvement partnership may form a consortia with one or more regional partners. All local, regional, or local and regional quality improvement partnerships shall submit a plan to the State Department of Education that describes how they will allocate funds and increase the number, qualifications, and competencies of early learning and care professionals in their county or region. The plan shall also describe how local partnerships will engage in collaborative partnerships with their members, local governmental agencies, businesses, nonprofit organizations, or other interested partners to improve the educational attainment of early learning and care professionals in their county or region, including those working in centers, family child care homes, and license-exempt settings that serve a majority of children who receive subsidized early
 learning and care services or are eligible to received subsidized early learning and care services, pursuant to this part.

(c) Workforce development grant award amounts shall be determined based on the following criteria:

(1) Demonstrated need for early learning and care professionals in each county or region.

(2) The cost of living in each county or region.

(3) The number of children under 13 years of age in each county or region who are in a family whose income is up to 85 percent of the state median income.

(d) Workforce development grants may be used for costs associated with the educational expenses of current and future early learning and care professionals that move those
 professionals along the early learning and care career lattice and support their attainment of increased education or English language proficiency, as well as professional development in early childhood instruction or child development, including developing competencies in serving children with exceptional needs and dual language learners. Allowable uses of funds include:

(1) Tuition, supplies, and other related educational expenses.

(2) Transportation and child care costs incurred as a result of attending classes.

(3) Substitute teacher pay for early learning and care professionals that are currently working in a subsidized early learning and care setting.

(4) Stipends and professional development expenses, aligned to the Quality Counts California
 professional development system in that area, as determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(5) Career, course, and professional development coaching, counseling, and navigation services.

(6) Other educational expenses as determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(e) Local, regional, or local and regional quality improvement partnerships awarded funding pursuant to this section may partner with local or online accredited higher education institutions, local agencies that provide high-quality, credit-bearing trainings, or apprenticeship programs that integrate and embed higher education coursework with on-the-job training of professionals.

(f) The Superintendent of Public Instruction may set aside no more than 1 percent of the
 total funding appropriated for the Early Learning and Care Workforce Development Grants Program to provide technical assistance and support for grantees and potential grantees on developing proposals for and implementing workforce development grants.

(g) Local, regional, or local and regional quality improvement partnerships receiving grants shall commit to providing program data to the State Department of Education, as specified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, including, but not limited to, recipient information, educational progress, and employment status, and participate in overall program evaluation.

(h) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall provide a report to the Governor as well as the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by October 1 of any year in which grants are awarded pursuant to this section on the expenditure of funds as
 well as relevant outcome data in order to evaluate the impact of the program.

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, with the concurrence of the executive director of the State Board of Education, shall recommend to the Department of Finance and the budget committees of the Legislature by January 1, 2021, any changes to the funding methodology in this section related to the recommendations and priorities provided pursuant to former Section 8207 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Transfer of Information [10315. - 10315.]

10315.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the state makes a substantial, annual investment in preschool, infant and toddler, and schoolage child development programs for eligible families. It is in the best interests of children and their families, and the taxpayers of California, to have information about the development and learning abilities of children developed in these settings, health and other information transferred to, or otherwise available to, the pupil’s elementary school.

(b) When a child in a state-funded preschool or infant and toddler program will be transferring to a local public school, the preschool or infant and toddler program shall provide the parent or guardian with information from the previous year deemed
 beneficial to the pupil and the public school teacher, including, but not limited to, development issues, social interaction abilities, health background, and diagnostic assessments, if any. The preschool or infant and toddler program may, with the permission of the parent or guardian, transfer this information to the pupil’s elementary school.

(c) Any child who has participated in a state subsidized preschool that maintains results-based standards, including the desired results accountability system, may have the performance information transferred to any subsequent or concurrent public school setting. Any transferred information shall be in summary form and only accomplished with the permission of the parent or guardian.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Early Childhood Policy Council [10320. - 10320.]

10320.

(a) The Early Childhood Policy Council is hereby established to advise the Governor, the Legislature, and the department on statewide early learning and care policy, including the planning for, and the implementation and evaluation of, the state’s Master Plan for Early Learning and Care and the 2019 California Assembly Blue Ribbon Commission on Early Childhood Education Final Report.

(b) (1) The council shall maintain at least two ongoing standing advisory committees: a parent advisory committee appointed pursuant to subdivision (e) and a workforce advisory committee appointed pursuant to subdivision (f).

(2) The council shall include 27 members who shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing authority as follows:

(A) Fourteen members appointed by the Governor, including those required pursuant to Section 9837b of Title 42 of the United States Code. One of the Governor’s appointees shall be the chairperson of the council.

(B) Four members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(C) Four members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(D) One member appointed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(E) Two members of the parent advisory committee, appointed by that
 committee.

(F) Two members of the workforce advisory committee, appointed by that committee.

(3) Members of the council shall include stakeholder representatives reflecting the comprehensive childcare system; represent the ethnic, racial, and language diversity of the state; and represent geographic diversity and those communities separated from opportunity due to poverty, racial bias, language, geographic isolation, disability, and other factors.

(4) Members of the council shall serve no longer than six years.

(5) To the extent funding for the council is provided in the annual Budget Act, language interpretation services shall be provided at convenings of the council and its committees to ensure language access and meaningful participation.

(6) To the extent funding for the council is provided in the annual Budget Act, members of the council or its committees who are provider participants or parent representatives shall be reimbursed as necessary for their reasonable expenses, including travel, a stipend to cover childcare costs, lost wages, and expenses for substitutes for attending council meetings.

(c) The council shall do all of the following:

(1) Convene at least four public meetings per year. These meetings shall provide access for participants throughout the state.

(2) Advise the Governor and perform activities required pursuant to Section 9837b of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) (A) Prepare a formal public annual report on the work of the
 council that includes, at a minimum, the successes, challenges, and gaps in the state’s early childhood education systems and recommendations to facilitate advancing the state’s vision for children, families, and communities.

(B) The council shall annually submit the report described in subparagraph (A) to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(4) Provide specific recommendations directly to the Governor, the Legislature, and the department on all aspects of the state’s early childhood education system, including on the following topics:

(A) Equity,
 with consideration for demographic, geographic, and economic diversity, and with a focus on family-centered two-generation approaches.

(B) Opportunities to incorporate a support model of accountability, as opposed to a compliance model of accountability, into the state’s early childhood education system.

(C) Ways that the state’s Master Plan for Early Learning and Care and the 2019 California Assembly Blue Ribbon Commission on Early Childhood Education Final Report can be updated and improved.

(5) Develop policy proposals and budget requests for the Legislature to consider related to facility needs, workforce needs, and family access.

(d) Staff for the council and its committees shall be provided by the California Health and Human Services Agency. From funding appropriated for purposes of this section, up to three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) may be used by the California Health and Human Services Agency for the costs to provide staff for the council and its committees.

(e) (1) The parent advisory committee shall be a standing committee of the council.

(2) The parent advisory committee shall include nine members who shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing
 authority as follows:

(A) Three members appointed by the Governor, including one consumer who receives services from a childcare center provider, one consumer who is on a subsidy waiting list at the time of the appointment, and one consumer who is a parent of a child with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 10213.5, who receives services from a childcare provider.

(B) Three members appointed by the Speaker of the
 Assembly, including one consumer who receives services from a family childcare home provider or a family, friend, or neighbor provider, one consumer who is a current or former CalWORKs childcare recipient, and one consumer who is connected to the child welfare system.

(C) Three members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, including one consumer who receives services from a transitional kindergarten provider, one consumer who represents a tribal organization who
 receives services from a
 childcare provider, and one consumer who pays privately for childcare.

(3) The Governor shall designate the chairperson of the parent advisory committee.

(4) If a person cannot be found to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2), the appointing authority may designate an alternate committee member.

(5) The parent advisory committee shall provide recommendations to the council and other entities on all aspects of early childhood education, including all of the following:

(A) Equity, access, and best practices for engaging families.

(B) Creating warm and welcoming care environments.

(C) How to develop local and state partnerships to support the best outcomes for families that interact with the state’s early childhood education system.

(f) (1) The workforce advisory committee shall be a standing committee of the council.

(2) The workforce advisory committee shall include nine members who shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing authority as follows:

(A) Three members appointed
 by the Governor, including one licensed family
 childcare home provider, one center-based childcare director from a subsidized childcare program, and one representative from a statewide organization representing childcare providers.

(B) Three members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, including one
 family, friend, or neighbor childcare provider, one representative from a Head Start program provider, and one representative from a community college that operates a program that provides early
 childcare education coursework and laboratory school experience.

(C) Three members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, including one representative from a childcare provider experienced in providing services to children with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 10213.5, in a full-inclusion environment, one center-based childcare teacher from a subsidized
 childcare program, and one provider who provides services to children from a tribal organization.

(3) The Governor shall designate the chairperson of the workforce advisory committee.

(4) If a person cannot be found to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2), the appointing authority may designate an alternate committee member.

(5) The workforce advisory committee shall provide recommendations to the council and other entities on all aspects of early childhood education on an ongoing basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 268, Sec. 1.   (AB 563)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. Local Programs [10330. - 10337.]

10330.

The governing board of any school district or a county superintendent of schools with the approval of the county board of education is authorized to establish and maintain child development programs upon the approval of, and subject to the regulations of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10331.

(a) The county superintendent of schools in each county, with the approval of the county board of education and the department, shall have the authority to establish and maintain child development programs and centers in the same manner and to the same extent as governing boards of school or community college districts, except that nothing in this section shall be construed as vesting in the county superintendents of schools any authority to alone effect the levy and collection of any county, school, or other local taxes for the support of any child development programs and centers.

(b) The establishment and maintenance of any child development program and center by the county superintendent of schools shall be undertaken, subject to the
 prior approval of both the county board of education and the department, upon the application of one or more school districts under their jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10332.

The governing board of any school district or the county superintendent of schools may do the following:

(a) Accommodate in a child development facility maintained by it children residing in another district, upon terms and under conditions agreed upon by the governing boards of both districts.

(b) Permit the use of, and furnish maintenance for, buildings, grounds, and equipment, and the use of existing administrative personnel for the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Adopt reasonable rules and regulations governing the child development services or facilities maintained by it that are not in conflict with law or the standards and
 regulations established for child development services by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10333.

The employees of school districts or community college districts, or county superintendents of schools in preschool and other types of child development services under this division shall have the same rights and privileges as are granted to employees of the same agencies in children’s centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10334.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a public or private agency, a school district, a community college district or a county superintendent of schools operating child development facilities may enter into an agreement with the Employment Development Department which will provide an opportunity to participants in work incentive programs under Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code for training in child development facilities. Training pursuant to such agreement shall have the objective of preparation for a career in the field of child development.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10335.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the governing board of a school district or community college district, county superintendent of schools, or other unit of local general purpose government may enter into agreements with any city, city and county, or other public agency, or with a private foundation or nonprofit corporation, for the furnishing to, or use by, the governing board, county superintendent of schools, or other unit of local general purpose government in carrying out the provisions of this part, of property, facilities, personnel, supplies, equipment and other necessary items and such city, county, city and county, other public agency, or private foundation or nonprofit corporation, is authorized to enter into such agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10336.

(a) The governing board of any school district or the county superintendent of schools shall establish in the county treasury a fund to be known as the “child development fund” into which shall be paid all funds received by the district or the county for, or from the operation of, child development services under this chapter. The costs incurred in the maintenance and operation of child development services shall be paid from the fund, with accounting to reflect specific funding sources.

(b) Funds of a district derived from the receipt of district taxes or derived from moneys apportioned to the district for the support of schools thereof, in addition to state moneys appropriated for the support of child development services, fees, and
 federal funds, may be expended for, or in connection with child development services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10337.

The governing board of any school district maintaining a child development program may include in its budget the amount necessary to initiate, operate, and maintain a child development program pursuant to this chapter and the board of supervisors shall levy a school district tax necessary to raise that amount. The tax shall be in addition to any other school district tax authorized by law to be levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19. Child Care Subsidy Plan for the City and County of San Francisco [10350. - 10356.]

10350.

The City and County of San Francisco may develop and implement an individualized county child care subsidy plan. The plan shall ensure that child care subsidies received by the city and county are used to address local needs, conditions, and priorities of working families in the community.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10351.

Before implementing the local subsidy plan, the City and County of San Francisco, in consultation with the department, shall develop an individualized county child care subsidy plan for the city and county that includes the following four elements:

(a) An assessment to identify the city and county’s goal for its subsidized child care system. The assessment shall examine whether the current structure of subsidized child care funding adequately supports working families in the city and county and whether the city and county’s child care goals coincide with the state’s requirements for funding, eligibility, priority, and reimbursement. The assessment shall also identify barriers in the state’s child care subsidy system that inhibit the city and county from meeting its child care
 goals. In conducting the assessment, the city and county shall consider all of the following:

(1) The general demographics of families who are in need of child care, including employment, income, language, ethnic, and family composition.

(2) The current supply of available subsidized child care.

(3) The level of need for various types of subsidized child care services including, but not limited to, infant care, after-hours care, and care for children with exceptional needs.

(4) The city and county’s self-sufficiency income level.

(5) Income eligibility levels for subsidized child care.

(6) Family fees.

(7) The cost of providing child care.

(8) The regional market rates, as established by the department, for different types of child care.

(9) The standard reimbursement rate or state per diem for centers operating under contracts with the department.

(10) Trends in the county’s unemployment rate and housing affordability index.

(b) Development of a local policy to eliminate state-imposed regulatory barriers to the city and county’s achievement of its desired outcomes for subsidized child care.

(1) The local policy shall do all of the following:

(A) Prioritize
 lowest income families first.

(B) Follow the family fee schedule established pursuant to Section 10290 of this code or Section 8252 of Education Code, as applicable, for those families that are income eligible, as defined by Section 10271.5 of this code or Section 8213 of the Education Code, as applicable.

(C) Meet local goals that are consistent with the state’s child care goals.

(D) Identify existing policies that would be affected by the city and county’s child care subsidy plan.

(E) (i) Authorize any agency that provides child care and development services in the city and county through a contract with the department to apply to the department to amend existing contracts in order to benefit from the local policy once it is
 adopted.

(ii) The department shall approve an application to amend an existing contract if the child care subsidy plan is approved pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10352, or modified pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10352.

(iii) The contract of a department contractor who does not elect to request an amendment to its contract remains operative and enforceable.

(2) (A) The city and county shall, by the end of the first fiscal year of operation under the approved child care subsidy plan, demonstrate an increase in the aggregate child days of enrollment in the county as compared to the enrollment in the final quarter of the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(B) The amount of the increase shall be at least equal to the aggregate child
 days of enrollment in the final quarter of the 2004–05 fiscal year for all contracts amended as provided in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1), under which the contractor receives an increase in its reimbursement rate, times 2 percent.

(C) The amount of the increase shall also be proportional to the total contract maximum reimbursable amount to reflect the changes in the budget allocation for each fiscal year of the plan.

(3) The local policy may supersede state law concerning child care subsidy programs with regard only to the following factors:

(A) Provide a family that qualifies for the second or third stage of child care services pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370), for purposes of eligibility, fees, and reimbursements, the same or higher level of benefit as a family that qualifies for
 subsidized child care on another basis pursuant to the local policy, except as otherwise provided in Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370). Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to impact or reduce any element in the second or third stage of child care services pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 10370) that provides a greater benefit to participating families than is provided for in the local policy.

(B) Fees including, but not limited to, family fees, sliding scale fees, and copayments for those families that are not income eligible, as defined by Section 10271.5 of this code or Section 8213 of the Education Code, as applicable.

(C) Reimbursement rates, including adjustment factors identified in Section 10281.5 of this code or Section 8244 of the Education Code, as applicable.

(D) Methods of
 maximizing the efficient use of subsidy funds, including, but not limited to, multiyear contracting with the department for center-based child care, and interagency agreements that allow for flexible and temporary transfer of funds among agencies.

(c) Recognition that all funding sources utilized by direct service contractors that provide child care and development services in the city and county are eligible to be included in the child care subsidy plan of the city and county.

(d) Establishment of measurable outcomes to evaluate the success of the plan to achieve the city and county’s child care goals and to overcome any barriers identified in the state’s child care subsidy system. The department shall have an opportunity to review and comment on the proposed measurable outcomes before they are submitted to the local child care and development planning council for approval
 pursuant to Section 10352.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit the city and county to change the regional market rate survey results for the city and county.

(f) Nothing in this section shall allow the city and county to adopt as part of its plan an increase to the regional market reimbursement rate beyond the level provided in the Budget Act.

(g) The plan may include stage one child care services in addition to alternative payment and direct service child care programs. If the plan includes CalWORKs child care, the plan administrator shall consult with their county welfare department to identify opportunities for alignment, ensuring families experience no break in their child care services due to a transition between the three stages of child care services and policies implemented in the
 plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10352.

(a) The plan shall be submitted to the local planning council, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 10480, for approval. Upon approval of the plan by the local planning council, the Board of Supervisors of the City and County of San Francisco shall hold at least one public hearing on the plan. Following the hearing, if the board of supervisors votes in favor of the plan, the plan shall be submitted to the department for review.

(b) Within 30 days of receiving the plan, the department shall review and either approve or disapprove the plan.

(c) Within 30 days of receiving any modification to the plan, the department shall review and either approve or disapprove that modification to the
 plan.

(d) The department may disapprove only those portions of the plan or modifications to the plan that are not in conformance with either this chapter or Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 10340) or that are in conflict with federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 260.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10353.
